Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6945YC (5) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423.3, subsection 18, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. A nonprofit corporation that is a 3 designated exempt entity under section 423.4, subsection 1, 4 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (11). 5 Sec. 2. Section 423.3, subsection 80, paragraph c, 6 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 (1) With regard to a written construction contract with 8 a designated exempt entity described in paragraph âaâ , 9 subparagraph (1), the sales price of building materials, 10 supplies, equipment, or services is exempt from tax by 11 this subsection only to the extent the building materials, 12 supplies, equipment, or services are completely consumed in the 13 performance of the construction contract with the a designated 14 exempt entity, and only if the property that is the subject 15 of the construction project becomes public property or the 16 property of the a designated exempt entity. 17 Sec. 3. Section 423.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 18 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 19 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) A domestic nonprofit corporation 20 organized under chapter 504 that has a majority of voting board 21 members appointed by political subdivisions of the state, 22 implements a regional recreational and dam safety plan, and 23 constructs horizontal and vertical infrastructure on land and 24 within rivers and watersheds as part of a regional water trail 25 system. 26 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 27 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 28 Sec. 5. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 29 retroactively to January 1, 2025, to all tangible personal 30 property or specified digital products sold, or services 31 furnished, to a designated exempt entity described in section 32 423.4, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (11), if 33 enacted by this Act, occurring on or after that date. 34 Sec. 6. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 35 -1- LSB 6945YC (5) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ retroactively to January 1, 2025, to building materials, 1 supplies, equipment, or services furnished to a contractor 2 and used in the performance of a written contract with a 3 designated exempt entity described in section 423.4, subsection 4 1, paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (11), if enacted by this Act, 5 occurring on or after that date. 6